Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-4,106
Excise tax; payment; report; duty to collect.

Every person using motor fuels subject to taxation on the use thereof under sections 66-4,105 and 66-4,114 shall pay the excise taxes and make a report concerning the same to the department in like manner, form, and time as is required by sections 66-488 and 66-489 for producers, suppliers, distributors, wholesalers, or importers of motor fuels. No such payment of tax or report shall be required if such tax has been paid and the report has been made for such user by any producer, supplier, distributor, wholesaler, or importer licensed under section 66-484. Producers, suppliers, distributors, wholesalers, or importers or other persons having paid such tax or liable for its payment shall collect the amount thereof from any person to whom such motor fuels are sold in this state along with the selling price thereof.

Laws 1931, c. 130, § 2, p. 364;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-417;

Laws 1943, c. 141, § 2, p. 485;

R.S.1943, § 66-429;

Laws 1963, c. 373, § 9, p. 1199;

Laws 1988, LB 1039, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-429;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 28;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 69;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 20.